District of Columbia statutes.
19-1311.03

Application to existing relationships.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on the effective date of this chapter [March 10, 2004]:

(1)

This chapter applies to all trusts created before, on, or after its effective date [March 10, 2004];

(2)

This chapter applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after its effective date [March 10, 2004];

(3)

This chapter applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before its effective date [March 10, 2004] unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies;

(4)

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to trust instruments executed before the effective date of the chapter [March 10, 2004] unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

(5)

An act done before the effective date of the chapter [March 10, 2004] is not affected by this chapter.

(b)

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before the effective date of the chapter [March 10, 2004], that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1106 of the Uniform Trust Code.